Washington statutes.
RCW 18.29.058

Delegated acts—Homebound patients.

(1)(a) Any person licensed in this state as a dental hygienist with two years of practical clinical experience within the preceding five years may perform delegated acts specified in (b) of this subsection on a homebound patient under the general supervision of a dentist licensed under chapter 18.32 RCW if the patient has first been examined by the supervising dentist within a time frame deemed appropriate by the supervising dentist.

(b) The acts that may be performed under (a) of this subsection are limited to the acts, specified in rule by the dental quality assurance commission, that a dental hygienist is authorized to perform under the general supervision of a dentist.

(2) Prior to performing acts under this section, the dental hygienist shall:

(a) Obtain information from the patient's primary health care provider about any health conditions of the patient that would be relevant to the provision of preventive dental care. The dental hygienist shall review and discuss any changes in health condition with the supervising dentist prior to treatment;

(b) Discuss appropriateness of care with the supervising dentist; and

(c) Obtain written consent from the supervising dentist.

(3) For purposes of this section:

(a) "General supervision" has the same meaning as in RCW 18.260.010; and

(b) "Homebound patient" means a patient incapable of travel due to age or disability.

[ 2013 c 87 s 3.]